test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-esa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - esa - ok : # -m animate noun, shell
     esa+N+AN+Sg: esa
     esa+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitesim
     esa+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitesim
     esa+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otesima
     esa+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: otesimiyiwa
     esa+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitesiminân
     esa+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitesiminaw
     esa+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitesimiwâw
     esa+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otesimiwâwa
     esa+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: otesimiyiwa

     esa+N+AN+Pl: esak
     esa+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitesimak
     esa+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitesimak
     esa+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otesima
     esa+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: otesimiyiwa
     esa+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitesiminânak
     esa+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitesiminawak
     esa+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitesimiwâwak
     esa+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otesimiwâwa
     esa+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: otesimiyiwa

     esa+N+AN+Sg+Obv: esa
     esa+N+AN+Loc: esihk
     esa+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitesimihk
     esa+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitesimihk
     esa+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otesimihk
     esa+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: otesimiyihk
     esa+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitesiminâhk
     esa+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitesiminâhk
     esa+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitesimiwâhk
     esa+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otesimiwâhk
     esa+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: otesimiyihk

     esa+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: [esis, esisis]
     esa+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: [esisak, esisisak]
     esa+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: [esisihk, esisisihk]

     esa+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kicesimisiwâw
     esa+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: ocesimisiwâwa
